CIK: 1275187
Company Name: ANGIODYNAMICS INC
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2018-07-23
Accession Number: 0001275187-18-000011


Item 1 Business. OVERVIEW AngioDynamics, Inc. (together with its subsidiaries, "AngioDynamics," the "Company," "we," "our" or "us") designs, manufactures and sells a wide range of medical, surgical and diagnostic devices used by professional healthcare providers for the treatment of peripheral vascular disease, vascular access and for use in oncology and surgical settings. Our devices are generally used in minimally invasive, image guided procedures. HISTORY AngioDynamics was founded in Queensbury, N.Y., U.S., in 1988. Queensbury was chosen due to its location in the heart of "Catheter Valley," an area in New York's Adirondack Region named for its long history of catheter and other medical device manufacturing. Initially dedicated to the research and development of products used in interventional radiology, AngioDynamics began manufacturing and shipping product in the early 1990s. The Company soon became well established as a producer of diagnostic catheters for non coronary angiography and thrombolytic delivery systems. The Company grew over the following years as a result of acquisitions of companies including RITA Medical Systems in January 2007, Oncobionic in May 2008, Vortex Medical, Inc. in October 2012, Clinical Devices in August 2013 and the assets of Diomed in June 2008 and the assets of Microsulis Medical Limited in January 2013 These acquisitions added product lines including market leading ablation and NanoKnife systems, vascular access products, angiographic products and accessories, dialysis products, drainage products, thrombolytic products, embolization products, venous products and targeted renal therapy products. More recently in May 2012, AngioDynamics acquired Navilyst Medical, bringing market leading fluid management systems into our portfolio. The acquisition significantly expanded the Company's scale, doubling its share of the vascular access market while building critical mass in the peripheral vascular market. Headquartered in Latham, N.Y., AngioDynamics is publicly traded on the NASDAQ stock exchange under the symbol ANGO. PRODUCTS Our product offerings fall within 3 Global Business Units (GBUs) Peripheral Vascular ("PV"), Oncology Surgery ("OS") and Vascular Access ("VA"). All products discussed below have been cleared for sale in the United States by the Food and Drug Administration (FDA). International regulatory clearances vary by product and jurisdiction. Effective June 1, 2018 PV is now Vascular Interventions & Therapies and OS is now Oncology. Peripheral Vascular Products AngioDynamics Peripheral Vascular product offerings support the medical areas of Venous Insufficiency, Thrombus Management, Fluid Management and Peripheral Products (Core). Thrombus Management Our Thrombus Management portfolio includes the proprietary AngioVac venous drainage cannula and circuit, as well as catheter directed thrombolytic devices and Uni Fuse infusion catheters. AngioDynamics offers a range of options when treating thrombus and removing fresh, soft thromboli or emboli. 2 AngioVac Our AngioVac venous drainage system includes a Venous Drainage Cannula and Extracorporeal Circuit. The cannula is indicated for use as a venous drainage cannula and for removal of fresh, soft thrombi or emboli during extracorporeal bypass. The cardiopulmonary bypass circuit is indicated for use in procedures requiring extracorporeal circulatory support for periods of up to six hours. AngioVac devices are for use with other manufacturers off the shelf pump, filter and reinfusion cannula, to facilitate venous drainage as part of an extracorporeal bypass procedure. The AngioVac venous drainage cannula is a 22 French coil reinforced cannula designed with a balloon actuated, expandable funnel shaped distal tip. The proprietary funnel shaped tip enhances venous drainage flow when the balloon is inflated, prevents clogging of the cannula with commonly encountered undesirable intravascular material, and facilitates en bloc removal of such extraneous material. Thrombolytic Catheters Thrombolytic catheters are used to deliver thrombolytic agents, which are drugs that dissolve blood clots in hemodialysis access grafts, arteries, veins and surgical bypass grafts. AngioDynamics Uni Fuse infusion catheter features pressure response outlets, a patented, time tested slit technology that provides a consistent, even distribution of fluid volume along the entire length of the infusion pattern, resulting in a 12 fold advantage over standard side hole catheters. We also offer the Pulse Spray infusion system for high pressure, pulsed delivery of lytic agent to shorten treatment time, and the Speed Lyser infusion system built for dialysis grafts and fistulas. Peripheral Products (Core) We offer a comprehensive portfolio for minimally invasive peripheral products. Product categories include an extensive line of angiographic catheters and diagnostic and interventional guidewires, percutaneous drainage catheters and coaxial micro introducer kits. Angiographic Products and Accessories Angiographic products and accessories are used during peripheral diagnostic and interventional procedures. These products permit physicians to reach targeted locations to deliver contrast media for visualization purposes and therapeutic agents and devices, such as percutaneous transluminal angioplasty (PTA) balloons. Angiographic products consist of angiographic catheters and guidewires. Yusuf SW, et al. Immediate and Early Follow up Results of Pulse Spray Thrombolysis in Patients with Peripheral Ischaemia. British Journal of Surgery 1995; 82338 340. 3 Our angiographic catheter line includes the following brands, all with radiopaque tips to assure excellent visibility under fluoroscopy Soft Vu flush catheters are available in flush and selective varieties. Flush Catheters are used in procedures where a high flow of contrast is required for big picture diagnostics. Anomalies discovered through a flush angiogram may require further investigation into a vessel of interest. Soft Vu selective catheters are used to gain access to smaller or more distal vessels and advance the catheter or wire into the diseased section. Accu Vu sizing catheters feature radiopaque marker bands at the distal (farthest away) portion of the catheter to provide a highly accurate measurement of the patient anatomy. This enables precise measurement for interventional devices (stents, filters, etc.) AngiOptic catheters have total catheter radiopacity, ensuring tip to hub visibility. This catheter is also constructed with a firm tip material that enhances stability during high flow injections, providing excellent pushability. Mariner catheters have a hydrophilic coating that, when combined with water, reduces friction. This makes insertion potentially easier and more comfortable for the patient, and can also be used for advancing through tortuous anatomy. AngioDynamics guidewires include Nit Vu (featuring a kink resistant NiTi alloy core facilitating smooth navigation through tortuous vasculature and accurate wire control) and PTFE Coated (fixed core and movable core) diagnostic guidewires. AngioDynamics catheters and guidewires are available in more than 500 tip configurations and lengths. Drainage Products Drainage products percutaneously drain abscesses and other fluid pockets. An abscess is a tender inflamed mass that typically must be drained by a physician. AngioDynamics offers 2 brands of drainage catheters for multi purpose general, nephrostomy and biliary drainage Total Abscession and Exodus. Each offer features and benefits depending on case presentation and physician preferences. Micro Access Kits Our Micro Access sets provide interventional physicians a smaller introducer system for minimally invasive procedures. Our Micro Access product line provides physicians with the means to choose from the wide selection of configurations, including guidewire, needle and introducer options. 2 lines are available in stiff standard, 10cm or 15cm and echogenic for visibility under ultrasound guidance Micro Introducer Kit and Ministick Max. Fluid Management Our Fluid Management product offerings include the NAMIC Fluid Management portfolio. Since 1969, the NAMIC product line has been a leader in providing clinicians high quality, dependable devices that help in the diagnosis and treatment of cardiovascular and peripheral vascular disease. The NAMIC product line includes an extensive offering of manifolds, contrast management systems, closed fluid systems, guidewires, disposable transducers and interventional accessories. These devices are utilized together and allow clinicians to aspirate or inject contrast, saline, remove waste and monitor invasive blood pressures throughout the procedure. Venous Insufficiency VenaCure EVLT laser system Our VenaCure EVLT (endovenous laser treatment) system products are used in endovascular laser procedures to treat superficial venous disease (varicose veins). Superficial venous disease is a malfunction of 1 or more valves in the leg veins whereby blood refluxes or does not return to the heart, thereby pooling in the legs and leading to symptoms such as pain, swelling and ulcerations. VenaCure EVLT uses laser energy to stop the reflux by ablating (collapsing and destroying) the affected vein. Blood is then re routed to other healthy veins. 4 The procedure is minimally invasive and generally takes less than an hour, allowing the patient to quickly return to normal activities with minimal post operative pain. VenaCure EVLT is sold as a system that includes diode laser hardware and procedure kits which include disposable laser fiber comp1nts, an access sheath, access wires and needles. Our VenaCure EVLT 1470 nanometer wavelength laser allows physicians to more efficiently heat the vein wall using lower power settings thereby reducing the risk of collateral damage. The NeverTouch tip fiber eliminates laser tip contact with the vein wall, which in turn minimizes perforations of the vein wall that typically result in less pain and bruising as compared to traditional bare tip fibers. The NeverTouch tip also maximizes ultrasonic visibility, making it easier for physicians to use. Procedure kits are available in a variety of lengths and configurations to accommodate varied patient anatomies. The VenaCure EVLT system comes with a comprehensive physician training program and extensive marketing support. Asclera (polidocanol) Injection Asclera (polidocanol) injection is the only FDA approved sclerosant with an indication to treat uncomplicated spider veins and uncomplicated reticular veins in the lower extremity. AngioDynamics distributes Asclera through a global agreement with the manufacturer and their distributor. In a multicenter, randomized, double blind, placebo and comparator controlled trial in patients with spider or reticular varicose veins, 95% of patients treated with Asclera showed good improvement or complete treatment success as rated by physicians and 87% of patients were satisfied or very satisfied with their Asclera treatment. Oncology Surgery Products AngioDynamics offers a range of comprehensive ablation technologies, including thermal tissue ablation systems (microwave energy and radiofrequency energy), surgical resection and the NanoKnife System, an innovative alternative to thermal ablation. IRE Ablation NanoKnife The NanoKnife System is an alternative to traditional thermal ablation that has received 510(k) clearance from the Food and Drug Administration for the surgical ablation of soft tissue. The NanoKnife Ablation System utilizes low energy direct current electrical pulses to permanently open pores in target cell membranes. These permanent pores or nano scale defects in the cell membranes result in cell death. The treated tissue is then removed by the body natural processes in a matter of weeks, mimicking natural cell death. Unlike other ablation technologies, NanoKnife Ablation System does not achieve tissue ablation using thermal energy. Weiss, Voigts, Howell (2011) Absence of Concentration Congruity in Six Compounded Polidocanol Samples Obtained for Leg Sclerotherapy. American Society for Dermatologic Surgery, Inc., Volume 37 1 4 5 The NanoKnife Ablation System consists of 2 major comp1nts a Low Energy Direct Current, or LEDC Generator and needle like electrode probes. Up to six (6) electrode probes can be placed into or around the targeted soft tissue. Once the probes are in place, the user enters the appropriate parameters for voltage, number of pulses, interval between pulses, and the pulse length into the generator user interface. The generator then delivers a series of short electric pulses between each electrode probe. The energy delivery is hyperechoic and can be monitored under real time ultrasound. Microwave Ablation Solero Microwave Tissue Ablation (MTA) System The Solero MTA System features the Solero Microwave (MW) Generator and the specially designed Solero MW Applicators. The solid state Solero MW Generator with a 245 GHz operating frequency can power up to 140W for optimized power delivery and fast ablations. The Solero MW Applicator optimized ceramic tip diffuses MW energy nearly spherically, and its patented cooling channel with thermocouple provides real time monitoring to help protect non targeted tissue during the ablation. In addition, the Solero MTA System offers physicians scalability with a single applicator designed for multiple, predictable ablation volumes by varying time and wattage. Solero is a single applicator system able to complete up to a 5 cm ablation in six (6) minutes at maximum power. The Solero MTA System and Accessories are indicated in the U.S. for the ablation of soft tissue during open procedures. The Solero MTA System is not intended for cardiac use. Radiofrequency Ablation StarBurst Radiofrequency Ablation Devices Radiofrequency Ablation (RFA) products use radiofrequency energy to provide a minimally invasive approach to ablating solid cancerous or benign tumors. Our StarBurst Radiofrequency Ablation devices deliver radiofrequency energy to raise the temperature of cells above 45 50 C, causing cellular death. The physician inserts the disposable needle electrode device into the targeted body tissue, typically under ultrasound, CT or Magnetic Resonance Imaging (MRI) guidance. During the procedure, our system automatically adjusts the amount of energy delivered in order to maintain the temperature necessary to ablate the targeted tissue. For a typical 5 cm ablation using our StarBurst Xli enhanced disposable device, the ablation process takes approximately ten minutes. The RFA system consists of a radiofrequency generator and a family of disposable devices. In addition to thermal ablation systems and NanoKnife, AngioDynamics also offers Habib 4X Surgical Resection devices that are used in minimally invasive laparoscopic surgery procedures in surgical specialties such as Hepato Biliary, GI, Surgical Oncology, Transplant Surgery and Urology (Partial Nephrectomy Resections). It is clinically indicated to assist in coagulation of tissue during intraoperative and laparoscopic procedures. Vascular Access Products Our portfolio of Vascular Access products includes a broad offering of peripherally inserted central catheters (PICCs), midline catheters, implantable ports, dialysis catheters and related accessories and supplies. These products are used to deliver, primarily, short term drug therapies, such as chemotherapeutic agents and antibiotics, into the central venous system. Delivery to the circulatory system allows drugs to mix with a large volume of blood as compared to intravenous drug delivery into a superficial vessel. Our Vascular Access product family also includes the proprietary BioFlo catheter. 6 BioFlo AngioDynamics offers BioFlo, the only catheter on the market with Endexo Technology, a material more resistant to thrombus accumulation, in vitro (based on platelet count). Endexo Technology is a permanent and non eluting polymer that is blended into the polyurethane from which the catheter is made. It is present throughout the catheter, including the extraluminal, intraluminal and cut catheter surface of the tip. Endexo Technology remains present for the life of the catheter. BioFlo long term durability and efficacy is intended to provide clinicians a high degree of safety and confidence in providing better patient care and improved patient outcomes. BioFlo catheters are available across the Vascular Access family of products, including PICCs, midlines, ports and dialysis catheters. PICCs A peripherally inserted central catheter, or PICC, is a long thin catheter that is inserted into a peripheral vein, typically in the upper arm, and advanced until the catheter tip terminates in a large vein in the chest near the heart to obtain intravenous access. PICCs can typically be used for prolonged periods of time and provide an alternative to central venous catheters. Our PICC product offerings include BioFlo PICC Our BioFlo line is the only power injectable PICC available that incorporates Endexo Technology into the manufacturing and design of the catheter. Advanced features such as large lumen diameters allow the BioFlo PICC to deliver the power injection flow rates required for contrast enhanced Computed Tomography (CT) scans compatible with up to 325 psi CT injections. BioFlo Midline The BioFlo Midline Catheter is an effective solution to preserving a patient peripheral access. It provides a cost effective alternative to multiple IV site rotations for patients who need short term venous access. Xcela PICC The Xcela PICC line is designed to provide a high degree of safety, ease and confidence in patient care. Advanced features such as large lumen diameters allow the Xcela PICC to deliver the power injection flow rates required for contrast enhanced CTs compatible with up to 325 psi CT injections. PASV Valve Technology The PASV Valve Technology is available in both BioFlo and Xcela lines and is designed to automatically resist backflow and reduce blood reflux that could lead to catheter related complications. Ports Ports are implantable devices utilized for the central venous administration of a variety of medical therapies and for blood sampling and diagnostic purposes. Central venous access facilitates a more systemic delivery of treatment agents, while mitigating certain harsh side effects of certain treatment protocols and eliminating the need for repeated access to peripheral veins. Depending upon needle gauge size and the port size, a port can be utilized for up to approximately 2,000 accesses once implanted in the body. Our ports are used primarily in systemic or regional short and long term cancer treatment protocols that require frequent infusions of highly concentrated or toxic medications (such as chemotherapy agents, antibiotics or analgesics) and frequent blood samplings. Our port products and accessories include BioFlo Port Our BioFlo Port is the only port available that features a catheter with Endexo Technology. Advanced features of the BioFlo Port include multiple profile and catheter options, a large septum area for ease of access and the ability to administer contrast through a CT injection for purposes of imaging. SmartPort The Smart Port power injectable port with Vortex technology offers the ability for a clinician to access a vein for both the delivery of medications or fluids and for administering power injected contrast to perform a (CT) scan. The ability to access a port for power injected contrast studies eliminates the need for additional needle sticks in the patient arm and wrist veins. Once implanted, repeated access to the bloodstream can be accomplished with greater ease and less discomfort. Our Smart Port is available in mini and low profiles to accommodate more patient anatomies. Vortex Our Vortex port technology line of ports is a clear flow port technology that, we believe, revolutionized port design. With its rounded chamber, the Vortex port is designed to have no sludge harboring corners or dead spaces. This product line consists of titanium, plastic and dual lumen offerings. 7 PASV Valve Technology The PASV Valve Technology is designed to automatically resist backflow and reduce blood reflux that could lead to catheter related complications. LifeGuard The LifeGuard Safety Infusion Set and The LifeGuard Vision are used to infuse our ports and complement our port and vascular access catheters. The needles low profile design is intended to allow clinicians to easily dress the site. Dialysis Products We market a complete line of dialysis products that provide short and long term vascular access for dialysis patients. Dialysis, or cleaning of the blood, is necessary in conditions such as acute renal failure, chronic renal failure and end stage renal disease (ESRD). We currently offer a variety of dialysis catheters, including BioFlo DuraMax Our BioFlo DuraMax is the only dialysis catheter with Endexo Technology. Advanced features of the BioFlo DuraMax dialysis catheter include large inner diameter lumens designed for long term patency, a proprietary guidewire lumen to facilitate catheter exchanges and Curved Tip Technology that allows the catheter to self center in the Superior Vena Cava (SVC). DuraMax The DuraMax catheter is a stepped tip catheter designed to improve ease of use, dialysis efficiency and overall patient outcomes. In addition, AngioDynamics also offers other renal therapies, including DuraFlow Chronic Hemodialysis Catheter, Schon Chronic Hemodialysis Catheter, EVENMORE Chronic Hemodialysis Catheter, EMBOSAFE Valved, Splitable Sheath Dilator and Perchik Button Suture Retention Device. RESEARCH & DEVELOPMENT Our growth depends in large part on the continuous introduction of new and innovative products, together with ongoing enhancements to our existing products. This happens through internal product development, technology licensing and strategic alliances. We recognize the importance of, and intend to continue to make investments in, research and development (R&D). Our R&D teams work closely with our marketing teams, sales force and regulatory and compliance teams to incorporate customer feedback into our development and design process. We believe that we have a reputation among interventional physicians as a strong partner for developing high quality products because of our tradition of close physician collaboration, dedicated market focus, responsiveness and execution capabilities for product development and commercialization. COMPETITION We encounter significant competition across our product lines and in each market in which our products are sold. These markets are characterized by rapid change resulting from technological advances, scientific discoveries and changing customer needs and expectations. We face competitors ranging from large manufacturers with multiple business lines to small manufacturers that offer a limited selection of products. Our primary device competitors include Boston Scientific Corporation; Cook Medical; Medical Comp1nts, Inc. (Medcomp); TeleFlex Medical; BD Medical Technology; Smiths Medical, a subsidiary of Smiths Group plc; Medtronic; Merit Medical; Terumo Medical Corporation; Johnson and Johnson and Total Vein Systems. We believe our products compete primarily based on their quality, clinical outcomes, ease of use, reliability, physician familiarity and cost effectiveness. In the current environment of managed care, which is characterized by economically motivated buyers, consolidation among health care providers, increased competition and declining reimbursement rates, we have been increasingly required to compete on the basis of price. We believe that our continued competitive success will depend upon our ability to develop or acquire scientifically advanced technology, apply our technology cost effectively across product lines and markets, attract and retain skilled personnel, obtain patent or other protection for our products, obtain required regulatory and reimbursement approvals, manufacture and successfully market our products either directly or through outside parties, and maintain sufficient inventory to meet customer demand. SALES AND MARKETING We sell our broad line of quality devices in the United States primarily through a direct sales force and internationally through a combination of direct sales and distributor relationships. We support our customers and sales organization with a marketing staff that includes product managers, customer service representatives and other marketing specialists. 8 We focus our sales and marketing efforts on interventional radiologists, interventional cardiologists, vascular surgeons, urologists, interventional and surgical oncologists and critical care nurses. MANUFACTURING We manufacture certain proprietary comp1nts and products and assemble, inspect, test and package our finished products. By designing and manufacturing many of our products from raw materials, and assembling and testing our subassemblies and products, we believe that we are able to maintain better quality control, ensure compliance with applicable regulatory standards and our internal specifications, and limit outside access to our proprietary technology. We have custom designed proprietary manufacturing and processing equipment and have developed proprietary enhancements for existing production machinery. We own 2 primary manufacturing properties providing capabilities which include manufacturing, service, engineering and research, distribution warehouses and offices. These facilities are registered with the FDA and have been certified to ISO 13485 standards, as well as the CMD CAS Canadian Medical Device Regulations. ISO 13485 is a quality system standard that satisfies European Union regulatory requirements, thus allowing us to market and sell our products in European Union countries. Our manufacturing facilities are subject to periodic inspections by regulatory authorities to ensure compliance with domestic and non U.S. regulatory requirements. See Government Regulation section of this report for additional information. See Item 2 "Properties" for details on each manufacturing location. In February 2017, we announced the consolidation of our global operations into 2 facilities located in New York State. Operations being d1 in the Denmead, U.K. and Manchester, GA. manufacturing facilities were consolidated into the Glens Falls and Queensbury, N.Y. facilities during fiscal year 2018. BACKLOG Historically, we ship the majority of products within 24 48 hours of receiving an order, and accordingly our backlog is not significant. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY Patents, trademarks and other proprietary rights are very important to our business. We also rely upon trade secrets, manufacturing know how, technological innovations and licensing opportunities to maintain and improve our competitive position. We regularly monitor and review third party proprietary rights, including patents and patent applications, as available, to aid in the development of our intellectual property strategy, avoid infringement of third party proprietary rights, and identify licensing opportunities. The Company owns an extensive portfolio of patents and patent applications in the United States and in certain foreign countries. The portfolio also includes exclusive licenses to third party patents and applications. Most of our products are sold under the AngioDynamics trade name or trademark. Additionally, products are also sold under product trademarks and or registered product trademarks owned by AngioDynamics, Inc., or an affiliate or subsidiary. Some products contain trademarks of companies other than AngioDynamics. See . Item 3 of this report for additional details on litigation regarding proprietary technology. LITIGATION We operate in an industry characterized by extensive patent litigation. Patent litigation can result in significant damage awards and injunctions that could prevent the manufacture and sale of affected products or result in significant royalty payments in order to continue selling the products. While it is not possible to predict the outcome of patent litigation incidents to our business, we believe the costs associated with this type of litigation could have a material adverse impact on our consolidated results of operations, financial position, or cash flows. The medical device industry is also susceptible to significant product liability claims. These claims may be brought by individuals seeking relief on their own behalf or purporting to represent a class. In addition, product liability claims may be asserted against us in the future based on events we are not aware of at the present time. At any given time, we are involved in a number of product liability actions. For additional information, see both . Item 3 of this report and Note 15 to the consolidated financial statements in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. 9 GOVERNMENT REGULATION The products we manufacture and market are subject to regulation by the Food and Drug Administration (FDA) under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, or FDCA, and international regulations to our specific target markets. United States FDA Regulation Before a new medical device can be introduced into the market, a manufacturer generally must obtain marketing clearance or approval from the FDA through either a 510(k) submission (a premarket notification) or a premarket approval application (PMA). The 510(k) procedure is available only in particular circumstances. The 510(k) clearance procedure is available only if a manufacturer can establish that its device is substantially equivalent in intended use and in safety and effectiveness to a predicate device, which is a legally marketed device with 510(k) clearance in class I or II or preamendment status based upon products commercially distributed on or before May 28, 1976. After a device receives 510(k) clearance, any modification that could significantly affect its safety or effectiveness, or that would constitute a major change in its intended use, requires a new 510(k) clearance. The 510(k) clearance procedure including questions and responses may take up to 12 months. In some cases, supporting clinical data may be required. The FDA may determine that a new or modified device is not substantially equivalent to a predicate device or may require that additional information, including clinical data, be submitted before a determination is made, either of which could significantly delay the introduction of new or modified device products. If a device cannot demonstrate substantial equivalence, it may be subject to either a de novo submission or a PMA. The PMA application procedure is more comprehensive than the 510(k) procedure and typically takes more time to complete. The PMA application must be supported by scientific evidence providing pre clinical and clinical data relating to the safety and efficacy of the device and must include other information about the device and its comp1nts, design, manufacturing and labeling. The FDA will approve a PMA application only if a reasonable assurance that the device is safe and effective for its intended use can be provided. As part of the PMA application review, the FDA will inspect the manufacturer facilities for compliance with its Quality System Regulation, or QSR. As part of the PMA approval the FDA may place restrictions on the device, such as requiring additional patient follow up for an indefinite period of time. If the FDA evaluation of the PMA application or the manufacturing facility is not favorable, the FDA may deny approval of the PMA application or issue a not approvable letter. The FDA may also require additional clinical trials, which can delay the PMA approval process by several years. After the PMA is approved, if significant changes are made to a device, its manufacturing or labeling, a PMA supplement containing additional information must be filed for prior FDA approval. Historically, our products have been introduced into the market using the 510(k) procedure. The process of FDA submissions requires extensive and expensive validations and testing. The financial outlay for this is large and requires a significant amount of time. Recent changes in both regulations and FDA perspectives have increased both time and testing requirements, which have caused significant delays and increased costs for approvals. The parameters for increased testing have and will continue to cause severe delays. The increased focus by the FDA on such issues as chemical identification of all colorants, non acceptance of certain colorants (certain forms of carbon black) and other concerns, continue to cause problems and delays. In addition, changes to existing products call into question previously approved devices and result in additional costs for testing and material analysis. The devices manufactured by us also are subject to the QSR, which imposes elaborate testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures. Every phase of production, including raw materials, comp1nts and subassembly, manufacturing, testing, quality control, labeling, tracing of consignees after distribution and follow up and reporting of complaint information is governed by the FDA QSR. Device manufacturers are required to register their facilities and list their products with the FDA and certain state agencies. The FDA periodically inspects manufacturing facilities and, if there are alleged violations, the operator of a facility must correct them or satisfactorily demonstrate the absence of the violations or face regulatory action. Penalties for failure to maintain compliance to the QSR include warning letters and potentially consent decrees. Failure to maintain the QSR appropriately could result in the development of further warning letters. In addition, non compliance with applicable FDA requirements can result in, among other things, fines, injunctions, civil penalties, recall or seizure of products, total or partial suspension of production, failure of the FDA to grant marketing approvals, withdrawal of marketing approvals, a recommendation by the FDA to disallow us to enter into government contracts, and criminal prosecutions. The FDA also has the authority to request repair, replacement or refund of the cost of any device manufactured or distributed by us. 10 Other U.S. Regulatory Bodies We and our products are also subject to a variety of state and local laws in those jurisdictions where our products are, or will be, marketed, and federal, state and local laws relating to matters such as safe working conditions, manufacturing practices, environmental protection, fire hazard control and disposal of hazardous or potentially hazardous substances. In addition, we are subject to various federal and state laws governing our relationships with the physicians and others who purchase or make referrals for our products. For instance, federal law prohibits payments of any form that are intended to induce a referral for any item payable under Medicare, Medicaid or any other federal healthcare program. Many states have similar laws. There can be no assurance that we will not be required to incur significant costs to comply with such laws and regulations now or in the future, or that such laws or regulations will not have a material adverse effect upon our ability to do business. International Regulation Internationally, all of our current products are considered medical devices under applicable regulatory regimes, and we anticipate that this will be true for all of our future products. Sales of medical devices are subject to regulatory requirements in many countries. The regulatory review process may vary greatly from country to country. For example, the European Union has a dedicated set of regulations regarding medical devices, specifically regulating their design, manufacturing, clinical trials, labeling and adverse event reporting. Devices that comply with those requirements are entitled to bear a Conformit Europ enne, or CE Mark, indicating that the device conforms to the essential requirements of the applicable directives and can be commercially distributed in countries that are members of the European Union. Similar regulations are in place for Canada, Japan, China and most other countries. In some cases, we rely on our international distributors to obtain regulatory approvals, complete product registrations, comply with clinical trial requirements and complete those steps that are customarily taken in the applicable jurisdictions. International sales of medical devices manufactured in the United States that are not approved or cleared by the FDA for use in the United States, or are banned or deviate from lawful performance standards, are subject to FDA export requirements. Before exporting such products to a foreign country, we must first comply with the FDA regulatory procedures for exporting unapproved devices. The process of obtaining approval to distribute medical products is costly and time consuming in virtually all the major markets where we sell medical devices. We cannot assure that any new medical devices we develop will be approved in a timely or cost effective manner or approved at all. There can be no assurance that new laws or regulations regarding the release or sale of medical devices will not delay or prevent sale of our current or future products. THIRD PARTY REIMBURSEMENT AND ANTI FRAUD AND CORRUPT PRACTICES REGULATION United States The delivery of our devices is subject to regulation by the Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) and comparable state and non U.S. agencies responsible for reimbursement and regulation of health care Item and services. U.S. laws and regulations are imposed primarily in connection with the Medicare and Medicaid programs, as well as the government interest in regulating the quality and cost of health care. Foreign governments also impose regulations in connection with their health care reimbursement programs and the delivery of health care Item and services. U.S. federal health care laws apply when we or customers submit claims for Item or services that are reimbursed under Medicare, Medicaid, or other federally funded health care programs. The principal U.S. federal laws include (1) the Anti kickback Statute which prohibits offers to pay or receive remuneration of any kind for the purpose of including or rewarding referrals of Item or services reimbursable by a federal health care program; (2) the False Claims Act which prohibits the submission of false or otherwise improper claims for payment to a federally funded health care program, including claims resulting from a violation of the Anti kickback Statute; (3) the Stark law which prohibits physicians from referring Medicare or Medicaid patients to a provider that bills these programs for the provision of certain designated health services if the physician (or a member of the physician immediate family) has a financial relationship with that provider; and (4) health care fraud statutes that prohibit false statements and improper claims to any third party payer. There are often similar state false claims, anti kickback, and anti self referral and insurance laws that apply to state funded Medicaid and other health care programs and private third party payers. In addition, the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (FCPA) can be used to prosecute companies in the U.S. for arrangements with physicians or other parties outside the U.S. if the physician or party is a government official of another country and the arrangement violates the law of that country. 11 International Our success in international markets will depend largely upon the availability of reimbursement from the third party payors through which healthcare providers are paid in those markets. Reimbursement and healthcare payment systems vary significantly by country. The main types of healthcare payment systems are government sponsored healthcare and private insurance. Reimbursement approval must be obtained individually in each country in which our products are marketed. Outside the U.S., we generally rely on our distributors to obtain reimbursement approval in the countries in which they will sell our products. There can be no assurance that reimbursement approvals will be received. INSURANCE Our product liability insurance coverage is limited to a maximum of $10 million per product liability claim and an annual aggregate policy limit of $10 million, subject to a self insured retention of $500,000 per occurrence and $2 million in the aggregate. The policy covers, subject to policy conditions and exclusions, claims of bodily injury and property damage from any product sold or manufactured by us. There is no assurance that this level of coverage is adequate. We may not be able to sustain or maintain this level of coverage and cannot assure you that adequate insurance coverage will continue to be available on commercially reasonable terms, or at all. A successful product liability claim or other claim with respect to uninsured or underinsured liabilities could have a material adverse effect on our business. ENVIRONMENTAL, HEALTH AND SAFETY We are subject to federal, state and local laws, rules, regulations and policies governing the use, generation, manufacture, storage, air emission, effluent discharge, handling and disposal of certain hazardous and potentially hazardous substances used in connection with our operations. Our operations are also subject to laws and regulations related to occupational health and safety. We maintain safety, training and maintenance programs as part of our ongoing efforts to ensure compliance with applicable laws and regulations. Although we believe that we have complied with environmental, health and safety laws and regulations in all material respects and, to date, have not been required to take any action to correct any noncompliance, there can be no assurance that we will not be required to incur significant costs to comply with environmental regulations in the future. EMPLOYEES As of May 31, 2018 , we had approximately 1,145 full time employees. N1 of our employees are represented by a labor union and we have never experienced a work stoppage. Executive Officers of the Company The following table sets forth certain information with respect to our executive officers. Name Age Position James C. Clemmer 54 President and Chief Executive Officer Michael C. Greiner 45 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer Stephen A. Trowbridge 44 Senior Vice President and General Counsel David D. Helsel 54 Senior Vice President Global Operations Warren G. Nighan 49 Senior Vice President Quality & Regulatory Affairs Heather J. Daniels Cariveau 44 Senior Vice President Human Resources Benjamin H. Davis 53 Senior Vice President Business Development Chad T. Campbell 47 Senior Vice President and General Manager, Vascular Access Brent J. Boucher 51 Senior Vice President and General Manager, Oncology Surgery Robert A. Simpson 46 Senior Vice President and General Manager, Peripheral Vascular Kim L. Seabury 51 Senior Vice President, Information Technology James C. Clemmer became our President and Chief Executive Officer in April 2016. Prior to joining AngioDynamics, Mr. Clemmer served as President of the $18 billion medical supplies segment at Covidien plc. where he directed the strategic 12 and day to day operations for global business divisions that collectively manufactured 23 different product categories. In addition, he managed global manufacturing, research and development, operational excellence, business development and all other functions associated with the medical supplies business. Prior to his role at Covidien, Mr. Clemmer served as Group President at Kendall Healthcare, where he managed the U.S. business across five divisions and built the strategic plan for the medical supplies segment before it was spun off from Tyco. Mr. Clemmer began his career at Sage Products, Inc. Mr. Clemmer currently serves on the Board of Directors for AngioDynamics and Lantheus Medical Imaging. Mr. Clemmer is a graduate of the Massachusetts College of Liberal Arts, where he served as interim president from August 2015 until March 1, 2016. Michael C. Greiner joined AngioDynamics as the Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer in August 2016. Mr. Greiner most recently served as the Chief Financial Officer at Extreme Reach. Prior to Extreme Reach, Mr. Greiner served as Senior Vice President Corporate Finance and Chief Accounting Officer at Cimpress N.V. (Vistaprint N.V.), Global Controller for GE Water and Processing Technologies division and in leadership roles at Bausch & Lomb and Wyeth. Mr. Greiner is also an advisor for Mirah, Inc., a measurement based behavioral health Company, and serves as the President of the Foundation for Faces of Children. Mr. Greiner received a Bachelor and Master of Science in Accounting from Fairleigh Dickinson University and Master of Business Administration from the Columbia Business School. Mr. Greiner is also a Certified Public Accountant (inactive). Stephen A. Trowbridge joined AngioDynamics as corporate counsel in June 2008, becoming our Vice President and General Counsel in June 2010 and Senior Vice President and General Counsel in August 2013 Mr. Trowbridge manages AngioDynamics legal matters, including corporate governance, mergers and acquisitions, finance, securities regulation, litigation, regulatory matters, intellectual property and compliance. Mr. Trowbridge also oversees the Company clinical affairs, medical affairs and healthcare economics departments. Prior to AngioDynamics, Mr. Trowbridge served as Corporate Counsel at Philips Healthcare and Intermagnetics General Corporation. Mr. Trowbridge began his career with Cadwalader, Wickersham & Taft LLP in the firm Mergers and Acquisitions and Securities Group. Mr. Trowbridge received a Bachelor of Science in Science and Technology Studies from Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute, a Juris Doctor from the University of Pennsylvania Law School, and a Master of Business Administration from Duke University Fuqua School of Business. David D. Helsel currently services as Senior Vice President of Global Operations and R&D and has been with AngioDynamics since December 2017. Prior to joining AngioDynamics he was Senior Vice President, Global Supply Chain, at Hill Rom Holdings for almost 3 years. Before that, Mr. Helsel worked at Haemontiecs for 3 years where he served as Executive Vice President for Global Manufacturing and also spent almost nineteen years in various positions with increasing responsibility at Covidien, including Vice President of Operations for the Surgical Solutions Division and Medical Supplies Division. An expert in Lean and Six Sigma, Mr. Helsel also served as Global Director of Operational Excellence, supporting sixty 3 manufacturing facilities. Mr. Helsel holds a Bachelor of Science in Mechanical Engineering from LeTourneau University. Warren G. Nighan joined AngioDynamics as the Senior Vice President of Quality and Regulatory Affairs in April 2017. Before joining AngioDynamics, Mr. Nighan was as a quality and regulatory consultant to clients in FDA regulated industries, specializing in execution and management of quality systems implementation and remediation. Previously, Mr. Nighan served as the Executive Vice President of Global Clinical, Quality Affairs and Regulatory Affairs at Haem1tics Corporation, Vice President of Quality Regulatory Clinical Technical Services at St. Jude Medical Atrial Fibrillation Division, and Corporate Vice President of Quality Compliance at Tyco Healthcare Covidien (Medtronic). Mr. Nighan earned a Bachelor and Master of Science in Nursing from Northeastern University Bouv College of Health Sciences. Heather J. Daniels Cariveau joined AngioDynamics in October 2016 as the Senior Vice President of Human Resources. Prior to joining AngioDynamics, Ms. Daniels Cariveau served as Human Resources Global Vice President at Zimmer Biomet, leading tactical and strategic HR initiatives for the Spine, Dental, Market Access Healthcare Economics and Craniomaxillofacial Thoracic businesses. Before Zimmer Biomet, Ms. Daniels Cariveau served in senior HR roles at GE, Datacard, H1ywell International, Inc. and Cigna Corporation. Ms. Daniels Cariveau holds a Bachelor of Arts in Broadcast Journalism and Spanish from the University of St. Thomas in St. Paul, Minn. and a Master of Arts in Human Resources and Industrial Relations from the University of Minnesota Carlson School of Management in Minneapolis, Minn. Benjamin H. Davis joined AngioDynamics as Senior Vice President of Business Development in March 2015. Prior to joining AngioDynamics, Mr. Davis most recently was the Vice President of Business Integration at C.R. Bard, Inc. where he also served as the Divisional Head of Business Development from 2004 2013 Before joining C.R. Bard, Inc., Mr. Davis held the position of Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer at Axya Medical Inc. He holds a Bachelor of Science in Business Administration from Bryant College and Master in Business Administration in Finance from Bentley University Graduate School of Business. Chad T. Campbell joined AngioDynamics in May 2016 as the Senior Vice President and General Manager for the Vascular Access Global Business Unit. In his role, Mr. Campbell oversees research and development and global commercialization of 13 the Global Business Unit portfolio. Mr. Campbell joined AngioDynamics from Medtronic where he served as the Vice President of Marketing for the Patient Care and Safety business after serving as the Vice President of Marketing for the SharpSafety business at Covidien (Medtronic). During his tenure at Covidien, Mr. Campbell also held roles including Director of Marketing, Area Vice President of Sales, Region Manager, Product Manager and Account Manager. Mr. Campbell received a Bachelor of Arts from the University of Kentucky. Brent J. Boucher is our Senior Vice President and General Manager of our Oncology business. Prior to joining AngioDynamics in November 2017, Mr. Boucher served as Executive in Residence for PDI's Infection Prevention business. Prior to that, he spent 20 years at Covidien where he served as General Manager for several global businesses, including Lung Solutions, Surgical Solutions and Respiratory Care. Mr. Boucher is a graduate of North Dakota State University. Robert A. Simpson joined AngioDynamics in February 2017 as the Senior Vice President and General Manager for the Peripheral Vascular Global Business Unit. In his role, Mr. Simpson oversees research and development and global commercialization of the Global Business Unit portfolio. Prior to AngioDynamics, Mr. Simpson served as the Vice President and General Manager of the Patient Care Global Business at Medtronic. He was responsible for leading the business strategy and operations while ensuring global execution. Prior to his role within the Patient Care business, Mr. Simpson led strategy and business development for Medtronic Patient Monitoring & Recovery business. Mr. Simpson also held various leadership roles in Sales and Marketing during his time at Covidien (Medtronic) and Alcon (Novartis). Mr. Simpson received a Bachelor of Science in Management Science Finance from the State University of New York at Geneseo and has completed a comprehensive, executive leadership development program at Babson College. Kim L. Seabury became the head of the AngioDynamics IT group in September, 2011 Prior to joining AngioDynamics, Mrs. Seabury served as Vice President of Emerging Technologies and Product Development for Pitney Bowes Software, managing global software development teams for both core products and emerging SaaS solutions. Prior to her role at Pitney Bowes, Mrs. Seabury held several key leadership positions at MapInfo Corporation, including Global Managing Director of IT, IT Business Applications Director and Director of Web Operations. Mrs. Seabury is certified in PSI, Operational Excellence, ITIL and is a Six Sigma Green Belt. In addition, Mrs. Seabury has extensive experience in project management and has participated in a variety of leadership development programs. Mrs. Seabury holds a Bachelor of Science degree in Applied Arts and Science from Rochester Institute of Technology. AVAILABLE INFORMATION Our corporate headquarters is located at 14 Plaza Drive, Latham, New York 12110. Our ph1 number is (518) 795 1400. Our website is www.angiodynamics.com . We make available, free of charge through our website, our Annual Reports on Form 10 K, quarterly reports on Form 10 Q, current reports on Form 8 K and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, as soon as reasonably practicable after we electronically file or furnish such materials to the Securities and Exchange Commission, or SEC. In addition, our website includes, among other things, charters of the various committees of our Board of Directors and our code of business conduct and ethics applicable to all employees, officers and directors. Any stockholder also may obtain copies of these documents, free of charge, by sending a request in writing to our investor relations department AngioDynamics, 14 Plaza Drive, Latham, N.Y. 12210, Attention Saleem Cheeks. Information on our website or connected to our website is not incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10 K. 14 Item 1A. Risk Factors. In addition to the other information contained in this Annual Report on Form 10 K, the following risk factors should be considered carefully in evaluating the Company's business. Our financial and operating results are subject to a number of factors, many of which are not within our control. These factors include those set forth below. Our business, financial condition or results of operations could be materially and adversely affected by any of these risks. Additional risks not presently known to us or that we currently deem immaterial may also adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operations. RISKS RELATED TO OUR BUSINESS Consolidation in the healthcare industry could have an adverse effect on our revenues and results of operations. Many healthcare industry companies, including medical device companies, are consolidating to create new companies with greater market power. As the healthcare industry consolidates, competition to provide goods and services to industry participants will become more intense. These industry participants may try to use their market power to negotiate price concessions or reductions for medical devices that incorporate comp1nts produced by us. If we are forced to reduce our prices because of consolidation in the healthcare industry, our revenues would decrease and our consolidated earnings, financial condition, or cash flow would suffer. We face intense competition in the medical device industry. We may be unable to compete effectively with respect to technological innovation and price which may have an adverse effect on our revenues, financial condition or results of operations. The markets for our products are highly competitive, and we expect competition to continue to intensify. We may not be able to compete effectively, and we may lose market share to our competitors. Our primary device competitors include Boston Scientific Corporation; Cook Medical; Medical Comp1nts, Inc. (Medcomp); TeleFlex Medical; BD Medical Technology; Smiths Medical, a subsidiary of Smiths Group plc; Medtronic; Merit Medical; Terumo Medical Corporation; Johnson and Johnson and Total Vein Systems. Many of our competitors have substantially greater financial and other resources to devote to product acquisitions, research and development, marketing and manufacturing; variety of products; technical capabilities; history of developing and introducing new products; patent portfolios that may present an obstacle to our conduct of business; name recognition; and distribution ne2rks and in house sales forces. Our competitors may succeed in developing technologies and products earlier, in obtaining patent protection or regulatory clearance earlier, or in commercializing new products or technologies more rapidly than us. Our competitors may also develop products and technologies that are superior to those we are developing or that otherwise could render our products obsolete or noncompetitive. In addition, we may face competition from providers of other medical therapies, such as pharmaceutical companies, that may offer non surgical therapies for conditions that are currently, or in the future, may be treated using our products. Our products are generally sold at higher prices than those of our competitors. However, in the current environment of managed care, which is characterized by economically motivated buyers, consolidation among healthcare providers, increased competition and declining reimbursement rates, we are increasingly being required to compete on the basis of price. If we are not able to compete effectively, our market share and revenues may decline. We face intense competition from other companies, and our inability to continue to effectively develop, acquire and or market new products and technologies could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations and or financial condition. The medical device business is intensely competitive and is characterized by rapid technological change, frequent product introductions and evolving customer requirements. Our customers consider many factors when choosing among products, including features and reliability, quality, technology, clinical or economic outcomes, availability, price and services provided by the manufacturer. We face competition globally from a wide range of companies, some of which may have greater resources than us, which may enable them to adapt faster than us to customer needs or changes in customer requirements. Product introductions, alternative products or enhancements by competitors that provide better features, clinical outcomes or economic 15 value and or offer lower pricing may make our products or proposed products obsolete or less competitive. In addition, the trend of consolidation in the medical device industry and among our customers could result in greater competition and pricing pressures. As a result, we engage in product development and improvement programs to maintain and improve our competitive position. These development and improvement programs involve significant investment in research and development, clinical trials and regulatory approvals and may require more time than anticipated to bring such products to market. We may not, however, be successful in enhancing existing products or developing new products or technologies that will achieve regulatory approval, be developed or manufactured in a cost effective manner, obtain appropriate intellectual property protection or receive market acceptance and we may be unable to recover all or a meaningful part of our investment in such products or technologies. Additionally, there can be no assurance that the size of the markets in which we compete will increase above existing levels or not decline, that we will be able to maintain, gain or regain market share or that we can compete effectively on the basis of price or that the number of procedures in which our products are used will increase above existing levels or not decline. As part of our business strategy, we also pursue the acquisition of complementary businesses, technologies and products. We may not be able to identify appropriate acquisition candidates, consummate transactions or obtain agreements with favorable terms. Further, once a business is acquired, any inability to successfully integrate the business, decreases in customer loyalty or product orders, failure to retain and develop its workforce, failure to establish and maintain appropriate controls or unknown or contingent liabilities could adversely affect our ability to realize the anticipated benefits of any acquisition. The integration of an acquired business, whether or not successful, requires significant efforts which may result in additional expenses and divert the attention of our management and technical personnel from other projects. These transactions are inherently risky, and there can be no assurance that any past or future transaction will be successful. If we fail to develop and successfully manufacture and launch new products, generate satisfactory clinical results, provide sufficient economic value, enhance existing products, or identify, acquire and integrate complementary businesses, technologies and products or if we experience a decrease in market size or market share or declines in average selling price or procedural volumes, or otherwise fail to compete effectively, our business, results of operations and or financial condition could be adversely affected. If we do not maintain our reputation with interventional physicians, interventional and surgical oncologists and critical care nurses our growth will be limited and our business could be harmed. Physicians typically influence the medical device purchasing decisions of the hospitals and other healthcare institutions in which they practice. Consequently, our reputation with interventional physicians, interventional and surgical oncologists and critical care nursers is crucial to our continued growth. We believe that we have built a positive reputation based on the quality of our products, our physician driven product development efforts, our marketing and training efforts and our presence at medical society meetings. Any actual or perceived diminution in the quality of our products, or our failure or inability to maintain these other efforts, could damage our reputation with interventional physicians and cause our growth to be limited and our business to be harmed. If we fail to develop or market new products and enhance existing products, we could lose market share to our competitors and our results of operations could suffer. The market for interventional devices is characterized by rapid technological change, new product introductions, technological improvements, changes in physician requirements and evolving industry standards. To be successful, we must continue to develop and commercialize new products and to enhance versions of our existing products. Our products are technologically complex and require significant research, planning, design, development and testing before they may be marketed. This process generally takes at least 12 to 18 months from initial concept and may take up to several years. In addition, product life cycles are relatively short because medical device manufacturers continually develop smaller, more effective and less expensive versions of existing devices in response to physician demand. Our success in developing and commercializing new and enhanced versions of our products is affected by our ability to recruit engineers; timely and accurately identify new market trends; accurately assess customer needs; minimize the time and costs required to obtain regulatory clearance or approval; adopt competitive pricing; timely manufacture and deliver products; accurately predict and control costs associated with the development, manufacturing and support of our products; and 16 anticipate and compete effectively with our competitors efforts. Market acceptance of our products depends in part on our ability to demonstrate that our products are cost effective and easier to use, as well as offer technological advantages. Additionally, we may experience design, manufacturing, marketing or other difficulties that could delay or prevent our development, introduction or marketing of new products or new versions of our existing products. As a result of such difficulties and delays, our development expenses may increase and, as a consequence, our results of operations could suffer. Development and sales of our products are dependent on a number of factors beyond our control, and our inability to make and complete research and development investments, enhance the product development process and be innovative to solve customer needs with respect to the respective products may adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. A significant aspect of our growth strategy is the continued market development of products including NanoKnife, AngioVac, Venacure EVLT and BioFlo products. There can be no guarantee that we will be able to develop and manufacture additional next generation or updated products on commercially favorable terms, or at all. NanoKnife and AngioVac are developing technologies and the inability of either of them to achieve clinical acceptance, as well as our inability to generate meaningful clinical data to convince providers of the clinical and economic benefits of our BioFlo platform, could severely limit our ability to drive revenue growth. We currently have FDA 510(k) clearance to market NanoKnife products for soft tissue ablation. If we are not able to secure FDA approval to conduct investigational device exemption (IDE) trials or marketing approval for additional or more specific indications, through 510(k) clearance, pre market approval or otherwise, our ability to market our NanoKnife products will be restricted which may have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Undetected defects may increase our costs and impair the market acceptance of our products. Our products have occasionally contained, and may in the future contain, undetected defects. When these problems occur, we must divert the attention of our engineering personnel to address them. There is no assurance that we will not incur warranty or repair costs, be subject to liability claims for damages related to product defects, or experience manufacturing, shipping or other delays or interruptions as a result of these defects in the future. Our insurance policies may not provide sufficient protection should a claim be asserted. In addition, the occurrence of defects may result in significant customer relations problems and injury to our reputation, and may impair market acceptance of our products. We, our competitors or other third parties, may engage in clinical trials with respect to our products. The results of these trials may be unfavorable, or perceived as unfavorable by the market, and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. Our products may be the subject of clinical trials conducted by us, our competitors or third parties for the purposes of obtaining regulatory clearances or to gather market data. Unfavorable or inconsistent clinical data from existing or future clinical trials conducted by us, by our competitors or by third parties, or the FDA's or the market's perception of this clinical data, may adversely impact our ability to obtain product approvals, our position in, and share of, the markets in which we participate and our business, financial condition, results of operations or future prospects. If we are unable to convince customers that our products can improve the cost structure of their business, our revenue growth and profitability may be materially adversely impacted. Worldwide initiatives to contain healthcare costs have led government and the private sector to enact cost containment efforts as a means of managing the growth of health care utilization. Common techniques include policies on price regulation, competitive pricing, bidding and tender mechanics, coverage and payment, comparative effectiveness of therapies, technology assessments, and managed care arrangements. These changes are causing the marketplace to put increased emphasis on the delivery of more cost effective medical devices and therapies. Government programs, including Medicare and Medicaid, private health care insurance, and managed care plans have attempted to control costs by limiting the amount of reimbursement they will pay for particular procedures or treatments, tying reimbursement to outcomes, shifting to population health management, and other mechanisms designed to constrain utilization and contain costs. Simultaneously, hospitals are redefining their role in health care delivery as many assume much more risk and control of the total cost of patient care. To successfully make this transformation health systems are consolidating, purchasing or partnering with physicians, post acute care providers, while also narrowing ne2rks thus allowing greater control over outcomes. Today, many systems are 17 becoming mini payer provider organizations. These newly redesigned health systems are creating mechanisms such as value analysis and centralized purchasing functions that set pricing and in some cases limit the number of vendors that can participate in the purchasing program. Hospitals are also aligning interests with physicians through employment and other arrangements, such as gainsharing, where a hospital agrees with physicians to share any realized cost savings resulting from the physicians collective change in practice patterns such as standardization of devices where medically appropriate. This has created an increasing level of price sensitivity among customers for our products. Some third party payers must also approve coverage and set reimbursement levels for new or innovative devices or therapies before they will reimburse health care providers who use the medical devices or therapies. Even though a new medical device may have been cleared for commercial distribution, we may find limited demand for the device until coverage and sufficient reimbursement levels have been obtained from governmental and private third party payers. In addition, some private third party payers require that certain procedures or that the use of certain products be authorized in advance as a condition of reimbursement. International examples of cost containment initiatives and health care reforms advancing clinical outcomes as the key to market access are emerging in France, Germany, the Netherlands and the UK. This new criteria can severely restrict coverage, reduce reimbursement and delay access to key markets with requirements for incremental clinical benefit and coverage with evidence development. Cost containment efforts of group purchasing organizations could adversely affect our selling prices, financial position and results of operations. Many of our existing and potential customers have become members of group purchasing organizations, or GPOs, and integrated delivery ne2rk, or IDNs, in an effort to reduce costs. GPOs and IDNs negotiate pricing arrangements with healthcare product manufacturers and distributors and offer the negotiated prices to affiliated hospitals and other members. GPOs and IDNs typically award contracts on a category by category basis through a competitive bidding process. Bids are generally solicited from multiple manufacturers with the intention of driving down pricing. Due to the highly competitive nature of the GPO and IDN contracting processes, we may not be able to obtain market prices for our products or obtain or maintain contract positions with major GPOs and IDNs, which could adversely impact our profitability. Also, sales through a GPO or IDN can be significant to our business and if we are unable to retain contracts with our customers, or acquire additional contracts, our financial results may be negatively impacted. We are dependent on single and limited source suppliers which subjects our business and results of operations to risks of supplier business interruptions. We currently purchase significant amounts of several key products and product comp1nts from single and limited source suppliers and anticipate that we will do so for future products as well. Any delays in delivery of or shortages in those or other products and comp1nts could interrupt and delay manufacturing of our products and result in the cancellation of orders for our products. Any or all of these suppliers could discontinue the manufacture or supply of these products and comp1nts at any time. Due to FDA and other business considerations, we may not be able to identify and integrate alternative sources of supply in a timely fashion or at all. Any transition to alternate suppliers may result in production delays and increased costs and may limit our ability to deliver products to our customers. Furthermore, if we are unable to identify alternative sources of supply, we would have to modify our products to use substitute comp1nts, which may cause delays in shipments, increased design and manufacturing costs and increased prices for our products. In addition, we purchase certain products as a distributor for the manufacturer of those products, including Asclera. Operational, quality or regulatory issues of the manufacturers of the products we distribute could constrain or interrupt the availability of those products or services. Any constraint or interruption in the supply of finished products that we distribute could have a material adverse effect on our ability to sell products, our financial condition and our results of operations. We are heavily dependent on third party distributors to generate a substantial portion of international revenues and are at the risk of these distributors also selling for our competitors along with being financially viable to be able to effectively distribute our products and make timely payment. Outside of North America we rely heavily on third party distributors, either on a country by country basis or on a multi country, regional basis, to market, sell and distribute our products. International distributors accounted for approximately 81% of international revenues for the year ended May 31, 2018 . In certain circumstances, distributors may also sell competing products to our own or products for competing diagnostic modalities and may have incentives to shift sales towards those competing products. As a result, we cannot assure you that our international distributors will increase or maintain our current levels of unit sales or increase or maintain our current unit pricing, which, in turn, could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition and cash flows. In addition, there is a risk that our distributors will not be financially viable due to current economic and or regulatory events in their respective countries. 18 Failure to secure adequate reimbursement for our products could materially impair our ability to grow revenue and drive profitability. Our products are used in medical procedures generally covered by government or private health plans. In general, a third party payor only covers a medical product or procedure when the plan administrator is satisfied that the product or procedure improves health outcomes, including quality of life or functional ability, in a safe and cost effective manner. Even if a device has received clearance or approval for marketing by the FDA, there is no assurance that third party payors will cover the cost of the device and related procedures. In many instances, third party payors use price schedules that do not vary to reflect the cost of the products and equipment used in performing those procedures. In other instances, payment or reimbursement is separately available for the products and equipment used, in addition to payment or reimbursement for the procedure itself. Even if coverage is available, third party payors may place restrictions on the circumstances where they provide coverage or may offer reimbursement that is not sufficient to cover the cost of our products. Third party payors who cover the cost of medical products or equipment, in addition to allowing a general charge for the procedure, often maintain lists of exclusive suppliers or approved lists of products deemed to be cost effective. Authorization from those third party payors is required prior to using products that are not on these lists as a condition of reimbursement. If our products are not on the approved lists, healthcare providers must determine if the additional cost and effort required in obtaining prior authorization, and the uncertainty of actually obtaining coverage, is justified by any perceived clinical benefits from using our products. Finally, the advent of contracted fixed rates per procedure has made it difficult to receive reimbursement for disposable products, even if the use of these products improves clinical outcomes. In addition, many third party payors are moving to managed care systems in which providers contract to provide comprehensive healthcare for a fixed cost per person. Managed care providers often attempt to control the cost of healthcare by authorizing fewer elective surgical procedures. Under current prospective payment systems, such as the diagnosis related group system and the hospital out patient prospective payment system, both of which are used by Medicare and in many managed care systems used by private third party payors, the cost of our products will be incorporated into the overall cost of a procedure and not be separately reimbursed. As a result, we cannot be certain that hospital administrators and physicians will purchase our products, despite the clinical benefits and opportunity for cost savings that we believe can be derived from their use. If hospitals and physicians cannot obtain adequate reimbursement for our products or the procedures in which they are used, our business, financial condition, results of operations, and cash flows could suffer a material adverse impact. Our success in international markets will depend largely upon the availability of reimbursement from the third party payors through which healthcare providers are paid in those markets. Reimbursement and healthcare payment systems vary significantly by country. The main types of healthcare payment systems are government sponsored healthcare and private insurance. Reimbursement approval must be obtained individually in each country in which our products are marketed. Outside the United States, we generally rely on our distributors to obtain reimbursement approval in the countries in which they will sell our products. There can be no assurance that reimbursement approvals will be received. The failure to secure reimbursement approvals in international markets could materially impact our financial position and results of operations. If a product liability claim is brought against us or our product liability insurance coverage is inadequate, our business could be harmed. The design, manufacture and marketing of the types of medical devices we sell entail an inherent risk of product liability. Our products are used by physicians to treat seriously ill patients. We are periodically subject to product liability claims, and patients or customers may in the future bring claims against us in a number of circumstances and for a number of reasons, including if our products were misused, if a comp1nt of our product fails, if our manufacture or design was flawed, if the product produced unsatisfactory results or if the instructions for use and operating manuals and disclosure of product related risks for our products were found to be inadequate. In addition, individuals or groups seeking to represent a class may file suit against us. The outcome of litigation, particularly class action lawsuits, is difficult to assess or quantify. Plaintiffs in these types of lawsuits often seek recovery of very large or indeterminate amounts, including not only actual damages, but also punitive damages. The magnitude of the potential losses relating to these lawsuits may remain unknown for substantial periods of time. We carry a product liability policy with a limit of $10,000,000 per product liability claim and an aggregate policy limit of $10,000,000, subject to a self insured retention of $500,000 per occurrence and $2,000,000 in the aggregate. We believe, based on claims made against us in the past, our existing product liability insurance coverage is reasonably adequate to protect us 19 from any liabilities we might incur. However, there is no assurance that this coverage will be sufficient to satisfy any claim made against us. In addition, we may not be able to continue to maintain adequate coverage at a reasonable cost and on reasonable terms, if at all. Any product liability claim brought against us, with or without merit, could increase our product liability insurance rates or prevent us from securing any coverage in the future. Additionally, if 1 or more product liability claims is brought against us for uninsured liabilities or is in excess of our insurance coverage, our financial condition and results of operations could be negatively impacted. Further, such claims may require us to recall some of our products, which could result in significant costs to us and could divert management attention from our business. We may be exposed to risks associated with acquisitions, including integration risks and risks associated with methods of financing. Accordingly, completed acquisitions may not enhance our financial position or results of operations or create value for our shareholders as they are based on projections and assumptions which are uncertain and subject to change. Part of our growth strategy is to acquire businesses and technologies that are complementary to ours. There is no assurance that acquisition opportunities will be available on acceptable terms, or at all, or that we will be able to obtain necessary financing or regulatory approvals. Any acquisitions that we do undertake would be accompanied by the risks commonly encountered in acquisitions, including the potential disruption of our business while we evaluate opportunities, complete acquisitions and develop and implement new business strategies to take advantage of these opportunities; inability of our management to maximize our financial and strategic position by incorporating an acquired technology or business into our existing offerings; our inability to achieve the cost savings and operating synergies anticipated in the acquisition, which would prevent us from achieving the positive earnings gains expected as a result of the acquisition; diversion of management attention from ongoing business concerns to integration matters; difficulty of maintaining uniform standards, controls, procedures and policies; challenges in demonstrating to our customers that the acquisition will not result in adverse changes in customer service standards or business focus; possible cash flow interruption or loss of revenue as a result of change of ownership transition matters; difficulty of assimilating the operations and personnel of acquired businesses; potential loss of key employees of acquired businesses, and the impairment of relationships with employees and customers as a result of changes in management; and uncertainty as to the long term success of any acquisitions we may make including the impact on contingent liabilities. There is no assurance that any completed acquisition will be accretive to our margins or profits in the short term or in the long term. If we proceed with 1 or more significant acquisitions in which the consideration consists of cash, a substantial portion of our available cash could be used to consummate the acquisitions. If we consummate 1 or more acquisitions in which the consideration consists of capital stock, our stockholders could suffer significant dilution of their interest in us. In addition, we could incur or assume significant amounts of indebtedness in connection with acquisitions. Further, acquisitions could also result in significant goodwill and or amortization charges for acquired businesses or technologies. Failure to attract additional capital which we may require to expand our business could curtail our growth. We may require additional capital to expand our business. If cash generated internally is insufficient to fund capital requirements, we will require additional debt or equity financing. In addition, we may require financing to fund any significant acquisitions we may seek to make. Needed financing may not be available or, if available, may not be available on terms satisfactory to us and may result in significant stockholder dilution. Covenants in our existing financing agreements may also restrict our ability to obtain additional debt financing. If we fail to obtain sufficient additional capital in the future, we could be forced to curtail our growth strategy by reducing or delaying capital expenditures and acquisitions, selling assets, restructuring our operations or refinancing our indebtedness. International and national economic and industry conditions constantly change, and could materially and adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. Our business, financial condition and results of operation are affected by many changing economic, industry and other conditions beyond our control. Actual or potential changes in international, national, regional and local economic, business and financial conditions, including recession, inflation and trade protection measures, may negatively affect consumer preferences, perceptions, spending patterns or demographic trends, any of which could adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operations. Our customers may experience financial difficulties or be unable to borrow m1y to fund their 20 operations, which may adversely impact their ability or decision to purchase or pay for our products. Disruptions in the credit markets have previously resulted, and could again result, in volatility, decreased liquidity, widening of credit spreads, and reduced availability of financing. There can be no assurance that future financing will be available to us on acceptable terms, if at all. An inability to obtain necessary additional financing on acceptable terms may have an adverse impact on us and on our ability to execute on our business plan. We are subject to a variety of market and financial risks due to our international operations that could adversely affect those operations or our profitability and operating results. Although our stock is traded on the NASDAQ Global Select Market, we are a global Company. Operations in countries outside of the U.S., which account for approximately 21% percent of our net sales for the fiscal year ended May 31, 2018 , are accompanied by certain financial and other risks that would not be faced by a Company operating purely within the U.S. We intend to continue to pursue growth opportunities in sales outside the U.S., especially in emerging markets, which could expose us to greater risks associated with international sales and operations. Our profitability and international operations are, and will continue to be, subject to a number of risks and potential costs, including fluctuations in currency exchange rates; healthcare reform legislation; multiple non U.S. regulatory requirement that are subject to change and could restrict our ability to manufacture and sell our products; local product preferences and product requirements; longer term receivables than are typical in the U.S.; trade protection measures and import or export licensing requirements; less intellectual property protection in some countries outside the U.S. than exists in the U.S.; different labor regulations and workforce instability; political instability; the potential payment of U.S. income taxes on earnings of certain foreign subsidiaries subject to U.S. taxation upon repatriation; the expiration and non renewal of foreign tax rulings; potential negative consequences from changes in or interpretation of tax laws; and economic instability and inflation, recession or interest rate fluctuations. There are recent legislative proposals to tax profits of U.S. affiliates which are earned abroad. While it is impossible for us to predict whether these and other proposals will be implemented, or how they will ultimately impact us, they may materially impact our results of operations if, for example, our profits earned abroad are subject to U.S. income tax, or we are otherwise disallowed deductions as a result of these profits. On June 23, 2016, the United Kingdom (U.K.) held a referendum in which voters approved an exit from the E.U., commonly referred to as Brexit . As a result of the referendum, it is expected that the British government will begin negotiating the terms of the U.K. future relationship with the E.U. Although it is unknown what those terms will be, it is possible that there will be greater restrictions on imports and exports between the U.K. and E.U. countries and increased regulatory complexities. These changes may adversely affect our operations and financial results. Finally, changes in currency exchange rates may reduce the reported value of our revenues outside the U.S, net of expenses, and cash flows. We cannot predict changes in currency exchange rates, the impact of exchange rate changes, nor the degree to which we will be able to manage the impact of currency exchange rate changes. Continuing worldwide economic instability, including challenges faced by the Euroz1 countries, could adversely affect our revenues, financial condition or results of operations. Since fiscal year 2008, the global economy has been impacted by the sequential effects of an ongoing global financial crisis. There can be no assurance that there will not be further deterioration in the global economy. Our customers and vendors may experience financial difficulties or be unable to borrow m1y to fund their operations which may adversely impact their ability to purchase our products or to pay for our products on a timely basis, if at all. As with our customers and vendors, these economic conditions make it more difficult for us to accurately forecast and plan our future business activities. In addition, trade receivables are in many countries (including, but not limited to, Greece, Ireland, Portugal, and Spain). Repayment of these receivables is dependent upon the financial stability of the economies of those countries. 21 In light of these global economic fluctuations, we continue to monitor the credi2rthiness of customers located outside the U.S. Failure to receive payment of all or a significant portion of these receivables could adversely affect our results of operations. Further, there are concerns for the overall stability and suitability of the Euro as a single currency, given the economic and political challenges facing individual Euroz1 countries. Continuing deterioration in the credi2rthiness of the Euroz1 countries, the withdrawal of 1 or more member countries from the EU, or the failure of the Euro as a common European currency could adversely affect our revenues, financial condition or results of operations. Our business could be harmed if we lose the services of our key personnel. Our business depends upon our ability to attract and retain highly qualified personnel, including managerial, sales and technical personnel. We compete for key personnel with other companies, healthcare institutions, academic institutions, government entities and other organizations. We do not have written employment agreements with our executive officers, other than the CEO. Our ability to maintain and expand our business may be impaired if we are unable to retain our current key personnel or hire or retain other qualified personnel in the future. In addition, our sales force is highly talented and there is high competition in the sales industry which could have an adverse effect on our business if there is significant turnover. RISKS RELATED TO OPERATIONS If we are unable to manage our growth profitably, our business, financial results and stock price could suffer. Our future financial results will depend in part on our ability to profitably manage our growth. Management will need to maintain existing customers and attract new customers, recruit, retain and effectively manage employees, as well as expand operations and integrate customer support and financial control systems. If integration related expenses and capital expenditure requirements are greater than anticipated or if we are unable to manage our growth profitably, our financial results and the market price of our common stock may decline. In recent years we have begun to implement our operational excellence initiatives which include a number of restructuring, realignment and cost reduction initiatives. While we have realized some efficiencies from these actions, we may not realize the benefits of these initiatives to the extent we anticipated. Further, such benefits may be realized later than expected, and the ongoing difficulties in implementing these measures may be greater than anticipated, which could cause us to incur additional costs or result in business disruptions. In addition, if these measures are not successful or sustainable, we may undertake additional realignment and cost reduction efforts, which could result in significant additional charges. Moreover, if our restructuring and realignment efforts prove ineffective, our ability to achieve our other strategic goals and business plans may be adversely affected. We have incurred significant indebtedness which imposes operating and financial restrictions on us which, together with our debt service obligations, could significantly limit our ability to execute our business strategy and increase the risk of default under our debt obligations. We have debt outstandingba of approximately $925 million as of May 31, 2018 . The interest rate on these borrowings is a floating rate which could expose us to the risk of increased interest expense in the future. The terms of our credit facilities require us to comply with certain financial maintenance covenants. In addition, the terms of our indebtedness also include certain covenants restricting or limiting our ability to take certain actions. These covenants may adversely affect our ability to finance future operations or limit our ability to pursue certain business opportunities or take certain corporate actions. The covenants may also restrict our flexibility in planning for changes in our business and the industry and make us more vulnerable to economic downturns and adverse developments. Our ability to meet our cash requirements, including our debt service obligations, will be dependent upon our operating performance, which will be subject to general economic and competitive conditions and to financial, business and other factors affecting our operations, many of which are or may be beyond our control. We cannot provide assurance that our business operations will generate sufficient cash flows from operations to fund these cash requirements and debt service obligations. If our operating results, cash flow or capital resources prove inadequate, we could face substantial liquidity problems and might be required to dispose of material assets or operations to meet our debt and other obligations. If we are unable to service our debt, we could be forced to reduce or delay planned expansions and capital expenditures, sell assets, restructure or refinance our debt or seek additional equity capital, and we may be unable to take any of these actions on satisfactory terms or in a timely manner. Further, any of these actions may not be sufficient to allow us to service our debt obligations or may have an adverse impact on our business. Our debt agreements limit our ability to take certain of these actions. Our failure to generate sufficient 22 operating cash flow to pay our debts or to successfully undertake any of these actions could have a material adverse effect on us. In addition, the degree to which we are leveraged as a result of the indebtedness incurred in connection with an acquisition or otherwise could materially and adversely affect our ability to obtain additional financing for working capital, capital expenditures, acquisitions, debt service requirements or other purposes, could make us more vulnerable to general adverse economic, regulatory and industry conditions, could limit our flexibility in planning for, or reacting to, changes and opportunities in the markets in which we compete, could place us at a competitive disadvantage compared to our competitors that have less debt or could require us to dedicate a substantial portion of our cash flow to service our debt. Despite our indebtedness, we may incur more debt, which could exacerbate the risks described above. We may be able to incur substantial additional indebtedness in the future subject to the limitations contained in the agreements governing our debt. Although these agreements restrict us from incurring additional indebtedness, these restrictions are subject to important exceptions and qualifications. For example, we are generally permitted to incur certain indebtedness, including indebtedness arising in the ordinary course of business and indebtedness relating to acquisition activities. See Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations Liquidity and Capital Resources . Our international sales and operations are subject to risks and uncertainties that vary by country and could have a material adverse effect on our business and or results of operations. Sales outside the United States accounted for approximately 21% of our net sales during our fiscal year ended May 31, 2018 . We anticipate that sales from international operations will continue to represent a significant portion of our total sales, and we intend to continue our expansion into emerging and or faster growing markets outside the United States. Our sales and profitability from our international operations are subject to risks and uncertainties that can vary by country, and include those related to political and economic conditions, foreign currency exchange rate fluctuations, changes in tax laws, regulatory and reimbursement programs and policies, and the protection of intellectual property rights. These risks and uncertainties could have a material adverse effect on our business and or results of operations. Foreign currency exchange rate may adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. We are exposed to a variety of market risks, including the effects of changes in foreign currency exchange rates. Products manufactured in, and sold into, foreign markets represent a significant portion of our operations. When the United States dollar strengthens or weakens in relation to the foreign currencies of the countries in which we sell our products, such as the euro, our United States dollar reported revenue and income will fluctuate. As a result of the June 23, 2016 referendum by British voters to exit the European Union, global markets and foreign currencies have been adversely impacted and the value of the Pound Sterling has sharply declined as compared to the U.S. Dollar and other currencies. This volatility in foreign currencies is expected to continue as the U.K. negotiates and executes its exit from the European Union but it is uncertain over what time period this will occur. The effects of currency rate fluctuations and changes in the relative values of currencies may, in some instances, have a significant effect on our business, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows. Our goodwill, intangible assets and fixed assets are subject to potential impairment. A significant portion of our assets consists of goodwill, intangible assets and fixed assets, the carrying value of which may be reduced if we determine that those assets are impaired. Most of our intangible and fixed assets have finite useful lives and are amortized or depreciated over their useful lives on either a straight line basis or over the expected period of benefit or as revenues are earned from the sales of the related products. The underlying assumptions regarding the estimated useful lives of these intangible assets are reviewed quarterly and more often if an event or circumstance occurs making it likely that the carrying value of the assets may not be recoverable and are adjusted through accelerated amortization if necessary. Whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying value of the assets may not be recoverable we test intangible assets for impairment based on estimates of future cash flows. If an intangible asset is considered to be impaired, the amount of the impairment will equal the excess of the carrying value over the fair value of the asset. We review our single reporting unit for potential goodwill impairment in the third fiscal quarter of each year as part of our annual goodwill impairment testing, and more often if an event or circumstance occurs making it likely that impairment exists. We conduct impairment testing based on our current business strategy in light of present industry and economic 23 conditions, as well as future expectations. The annual goodwill impairment review performed in December 2017 indicated no goodwill impairments. If actual results differ from the assumptions and estimates used in the goodwill and intangible asset calculations, we could incur future impairment or amortization charges, which could negatively impact our results of operations. We may be limited in our ability to utilize, or may not be able to utilize, net operating loss carryforwards to reduce our future tax liability. IRC Section 382 and related provisions contain rules that limit for U.S. federal income tax purposes the ability of a Company that undergoes an ownership change to utilize its net operating loss carryforwards and certain other tax attributes existing as of the date of such ownership change. Our Federal net operating loss carryforwards as of May 31, 2018 after considering IRC Section 382 limitations are $157.8 million . The expiration of the Federal net operating loss carryforwards is as follows $28.8 million between 2018 and 2023 and $129.0 million between 2027 and 2037. Our state net operating loss carryforwards as of May 31, 2018 after considering remaining IRC Section 382 limitations are $19.1 million which expire in various years from 2018 to 2038. Future ownership changes within the meaning of IRC Section 382 may also subject our tax loss carryforwards to annual limitations which would restrict our ability to use them to offset our taxable income in periods following the ownership changes. See Note 9 to our consolidated financial statements included in our Annual Report on Form 10 K for the fiscal year ended May 31, 2018 for a further discussion of our tax loss carryovers. Fluctuations in our effective tax rate and changes to tax laws may adversely affect us. As an international Company, we are subject to taxation in numerous countries, states and other jurisdictions. Our effective tax rate is derived from a combination of applicable tax rates in the various countries, states and other jurisdictions in which we operate. In preparing our financial statements, we estimate the amount of tax that will become payable in each of these jurisdictions. Our effective tax rate may, however, differ from the estimated amount due to numerous factors, including a change in the mix of our profitability from country to country and changes in tax laws. Any of these factors could cause us to experience an effective tax rate significantly different from previous periods or our current expectations, which could have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations and cash flows. We rely on the proper function, availability and security of information technology systems to operate our business and a cyber attack or other breach of these systems could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. We rely on information technology systems to process, transmit, and store electronic information in our day to day operations. Similar to other large multi national companies, the size and complexity of our information technology systems makes them vulnerable to a cyber attack, malicious intrusion, breakdown, destruction, loss of data privacy, or other significant disruption. Our information systems require an ongoing commitment of significant resources to maintain, protect, and enhance existing systems and develop new systems to keep pace with continuing changes in information processing technology, evolving systems and regulatory standards, the increasing need to protect patient and customer information, and changing customer patterns. In addition, third parties may attempt to hack into our products to obtain data relating to patients with our products or our proprietary information. Any failure by us to maintain or protect our information technology systems and data integrity, including from cyber attacks, intrusions or other breaches, could result in the unauthorized access to patient data and personally identifiable information, theft of intellectual property or other misappropriation of assets, or otherwise compromise our confidential or proprietary information and disrupt our operations. Any of these events, in turn, may cause us to lose existing customers, have difficulty preventing, detecting, and controlling fraud, have disputes with customers, physicians, and other health care professionals, be subject to legal claims and liability, have regulatory sanctions or penalties imposed, have increases in operating expenses, incur expenses or lose revenues as a result of a data privacy breach or theft of intellectual property, or suffer other adverse consequences, any of which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. Any disaster at our manufacturing facilities could disrupt our ability to manufacture our products for a substantial amount of time, which could cause our revenues to decrease. We conduct our manufacturing and assembly at facilities in Queensbury, New York and Glens Falls, New York. It would be difficult, expensive and time consuming to transfer resources from 1 facility to the other, replace, or repair these facilities and our manufacturing equipment if they were significantly affected by a disaster. Additionally, we might be forced to rely on 24 third party manufacturers or to delay production of our products. Insurance for damage to our properties and the disruption of our business from disasters may not be sufficient to cover all of our potential losses and may not continue to be available to us on acceptable terms, or at all. In addition, if 1 of our principal suppliers were to experience a similar disaster, uninsured loss or under insured loss, we might not be able to obtain adequate alternative sources of supplies or products or could face significant delays and incur substantial expense in doing so. Any significant uninsured loss, prolonged or repeated disruption, or inability to operate experienced by us or any of our principal suppliers could cause significant harm to our business, financial condition and results of operations. Manufacturing and assembly takes place in Queensbury, New York and Glens Falls, New York. If we were significantly affected by a disaster, we no longer have an option to transfer manufacturing to another facility so we would be forced to rely on third party manufacturers or would have to delay production of our products. Anti takeover provisions in our organizational documents and Delaware law may discourage or prevent a change of control, even if an acquisition would be beneficial to our stockholders, which could cause our stock price to decline and prevent attempts by our stockholders to replace or remove our current management. Our amended and restated certificate of incorporation and our amended and restated bylaws contain provisions that may enable our management to resist a change in control. These provisions may discourage, delay or prevent a change in the ownership of our Company or a change in our management. In addition, these provisions could limit the price that investors would be willing to pay in the future for shares of our common stock. Such provisions include our board of directors is authorized, without prior stockholder approval, to create and issue blank check preferred stock, with rights senior to those of our common stock; our board of directors is classified so that not all members of our board of directors are elected at 1 time, which may make it more difficult for a person who acquires control of a majority of our outstanding voting stock to replace our directors; advance notice requirements for stockholders to nominate individuals to serve on our board of directors or for stockholders to submit proposals that can be acted upon at stockholder meetings; stockholder action by written consent is prohibited; and stockholders are not permitted to cumulatively vote for the election of directors. We are also subject to the provisions of Section 203 of the Delaware General Corporation Law, which may prohibit certain business combinations with stockholders owning 15% or more of our outstanding voting stock. These and other provisions in our amended and restated certificate of incorporation, amended and restated bylaws and Delaware law could make it more difficult for stockholders or potential acquirers to obtain control of our board of directors or initiate actions that are opposed by our then current board of directors, including delaying or impeding a merger, tender offer or proxy contest involving our Company. Any delay or prevention of a change of control transaction or changes in our board of directors could cause the market price of our common stock to decline. RISKS RELATED TO THE REGULATORY ENVIRONMENT Reforms to the United States healthcare system may adversely affect our business. In response to perceived increases in health care costs in recent years, there have been and continue to be proposals by the federal government, state governments, regulators and third party payers to control these costs and, more generally, to reform the health care system, including U.S. health care reform legislation. Certain of these proposals could, among other things, limit the prices we are able to charge for our products or the amounts of reimbursement available for our products and could limit the acceptance and availability of our products. The adoption of some or all of these proposals could have an adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition and cash flows. 25 Our industry is experiencing greater scrutiny and regulation by governmental authorities, which has led to certain costs and business distractions as we respond to inquiries and comply with new regulations, and may lead to greater governmental regulation in the future. Our medical devices and our business activities are subject to rigorous regulation by the FDA and numerous other federal, state and foreign governmental authorities. These authorities and members of Congress have been increasing their scrutiny of our industry. In addition, certain states, including Massachusetts, have recently passed or are considering legislation restricting our interactions with health care providers and requiring disclosure of many payments to them. The federal government has recently introduced similar legislation, which may or may not preempt state laws. Recent Supreme Court case law has clarified that the FDA authority over medical devices preempts state tort laws, but legislation has been introduced at the federal level to allow state intervention, which could lead to increased and inconsistent regulation at the state level. We anticipate that the government will continue to scrutinize our industry closely, and that additional regulation by governmental authorities may increase compliance costs, exposure to litigation and other adverse effects to our operations. We are subject to a comprehensive system of federal, state and international laws and regulations, and we could be the subject of investigations, enforcement actions or face lawsuits and m1tary or equitable judgments. We operate in many parts of the world, and our operations are affected by complex state, federal and international laws relating to healthcare, environmental protection, antitrust, anti corruption, anti bribery, fraud and abuse, export control, tax, employment and laws regarding privacy, personally identifiable information and protected health information, including, for example, the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act ( FDCA ), various FDA and international regulations relating to, among other things, the development, quality assurance, manufacturing, importation, distribution, marketing and sale of, and billing for, our products, the federal Anti Kickback Statute and Federal False Claims Act (see Note 15), the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act ( FCPA ), the UK Bribery Act of 2010, the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 ( HIPAA ), General Data Protection Regulation ("GDPR") and other foreign data protection and privacy laws, and laws and regulations relating to sanctions and m1y laundering. We are subject to periodic inspections to determine compliance with the FDA Quality System Regulation requirements, current medical device adverse event reporting regulations, and similar foreign rules and regulations. Despite our training and compliance programs, our internal control policies and procedures may not always protect us from negligent, reckless or criminal acts committed by our employees or agents. The failure to comply with these laws and regulatory standards, allegations of such non compliance or the discovery of previously unknown problems with a product or manufacturer (i) could result in FDA Form 483 notices and or warning letters or the foreign equivalent, fines, delays or suspensions of regulatory clearances, investigations, detainment, seizures or recalls of products (with the attendant expenses), the banning of a particular device, an order to replace or refund the cost of any device previously manufactured or distributed, operating restrictions and or civil or criminal prosecution, and or penalties, as well as decreased sales as a result of negative publicity and product liability claims; and (ii) could disrupt our business and could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition and or liquidity. Most of our products must receive clearance or approval from the FDA or comparable regulatory agencies abroad before they can be marketed or sold. State, federal and foreign registration regulations are both evolving and subject to varied levels of interpretation and enforcement. It can be costly and time consuming to obtain and maintain regulatory approvals to market a medical device. Approvals might not be granted on a timely basis, if at all, for new devices, new indications for use or certain modifications or enhancements to previously approved products. Even after a device receives regulatory approval it remains subject to significant regulatory and quality requirements, such as manufacturing, recordkeeping, renewal, recertification or reporting and other post market approval requirements, which may include clinical, laboratory or other studies. Product approvals by the FDA and other foreign regulators can be withdrawn due to failure to comply with regulatory standards or the occurrence of unforeseen problems following initial approval or may be re classified to a higher regulatory classification, such as requiring a Pre Market Approval ( PMA ) for a previously cleared 510(k) device. Regulations are also subject to change as a result of legislative, administrative or judicial action, which may further increase our costs or reduce sales. Our failure to maintain approvals, obtain approval for new products or comply with other applicable regulatory requirements could adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition and or liquidity. The healthcare industry is under continued scrutiny from state, federal and international governments with respect to industry practices in the area of sales and marketing, including provisions of the Physician Payment Sunshine Act. If our marketing, sales or other activities fail to comply with the FDA or other comparable foreign regulatory agencies regulations or guidelines, or other applicable laws, we may be subject to warnings from the FDA or investigations or enforcement actions from the FDA, Medicare, the Office of Inspector General of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services or other government agencies or enforcement bodies. Additionally, in the European Union, a new draft Medical Device Regulation was published in 2016 imposing stricter requirements for the marketing and sale of medical devices and grants Notified Bodies increased post market surveillance authority. The Company is monitoring the implementation of the regulation and has 26 undertaken initial actions to move toward compliance based on the published draft of the regulation. The Company failure to comply with any marketing or sales regulations or any other applicable regulatory requirements could adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition and or liquidity. In the recent past, medical device manufacturers have been the subject of investigations from government agencies related to their relationships with doctors, product sales and marketing and off label promotion of products, among other activities or practices. If an enforcement action involving the Company were to occur, it could result in penalties, fines, detainment, seizures, recalls, product bans, operating restrictions (which may include loss of a license or authorization), the exclusion of our products from reimbursement under government funded programs and or prohibitions on our ability to sell our products, and could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition and or liquidity. In addition, remediation of any issues identified by the FDA or other regulators could require facility upgrades, process changes, additional labeling requirements or other measures, any of which could have a material adverse effect on our business and or results of operations. In addition, lawsuits by or otherwise involving employees, customers, licensors, licensees, suppliers, vendors, business partners, distributors, shareholders or competitors with respect to how we conduct our business could be very costly and could substantially disrupt our business. Disputes from time to time with companies or individuals are not uncommon, and we cannot assure you that we will be able to resolve these disputes on terms favorable to us. The occurrence of an adverse m1tary or equitable judgment or a large expenditure in connection with a settlement of any of these matters could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition and or liquidity. We are subject to healthcare fraud and abuse regulations that could result in significant liability, require us to change our business practices and restrict our operations in the future. We are subject to various federal, state and local laws targeting fraud and abuse in the healthcare industry, including anti kickback and false claims laws. Violations of these laws are punishable by criminal or civil sanctions, including substantial fines, imprisonment and exclusion from participation in healthcare programs such as Medicare and Medicaid and health programs outside the United States. These laws and regulations are wide ranging and subject to changing interpretation and application, which could restrict our sales or marketing practices. Furthermore, since many of our customers rely on reimbursement from Medicare, Medicaid and other governmental programs to cover a substantial portion of their expenditures, our exclusion from such programs as a result of a violation of these laws could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations, financial condition and cash flow. If we or some of our suppliers fail to comply with the FDA Quality System Regulation, or QSR, and other applicable postmarket requirements, our manufacturing operations could be disrupted, our product sales and profitability could suffer, and we may be subject to a wide variety of FDA enforcement actions. After a device is placed on the market, numerous regulatory requirements apply. We are subject to inspection and marketing surveillance by the FDA to determine our compliance with all regulatory requirements. Our failure to comply with applicable regulatory requirements could result in the FDA or a court instituting a wide variety of enforcement actions against us, including a public "Warning Letter"; an order to shut down some or all manufacturing operations; a recall of products; fines or civil penalties; seizure or detention of our products; refusing our requests for 510(k) clearance or a PMA of new or modified products; withdrawing 510(k) clearance or PMA approvals already granted to us; and criminal prosecution. Our manufacturing processes and those of some of our suppliers must comply with the FDA Quality System Regulation, or QSR, which governs the methods used in, and the facilities and controls used for, the design, testing, manufacture, control, quality assurance, installation, servicing, labeling, packaging, storage and shipping of medical devices. The FDA enforces the QSR through unannounced inspections. If we, or 1 of our suppliers, fail a QSR inspection, or if a corrective action plan adopted by us or 1 of our suppliers is not sufficient, the FDA may bring an enforcement action, and our operations could be disrupted and our manufacturing delayed. We are also subject to the FDA general prohibition against promoting our products for unapproved or off label uses, the FDA adverse event reporting requirements and the FDA reporting requirements for field correction or product removals. The FDA has recently placed increased emphasis on its scrutiny of compliance with the QSR and these other postmarket requirements. If we, or 1 of our suppliers, violate the FDA requirements or fail to take adequate corrective action in response to any significant compliance issue raised by the FDA, the FDA can take various enforcement actions which could cause our product sales and profitability to suffer. 27 In addition, most other countries require us and our suppliers to comply with manufacturing and quality assurance standards for medical devices that are similar to those in force in the United States before marketing and selling our products in those countries. If we, or our suppliers, should fail to do so, we would lose our ability to market and sell our products in those countries. If we cannot obtain and maintain marketing clearance or approval from governmental agencies, we will not be able to sell our products. Our products are medical devices that are subject to extensive regulation in the United States and in the foreign countries in which they are sold. Unless an exemption applies, each medical device that we wish to market in the United States must receive either 510(k) clearance or premarket approval (PMA) from the FDA before the product can be sold. Either process can be lengthy and expensive. The FDA 510(k) clearance procedure, also known as premarket notification, is the process we have used for our current products. This process usually takes from four to twelve months from the date the premarket notification is submitted to the FDA, but may take significantly longer. Although we have obtained 510(k) clearances for our current products, our clearances may be revoked by the FDA if safety or effectiveness problems develop with the devices. The PMA process is much more costly, lengthy and uncertain. It generally takes from 1 to 3 years from the date the application is submitted to, and filed with the FDA, and may take even longer. Regulatory regimes in other countries similarly require approval or clearance prior to our marketing or selling products in those countries. We rely on our distributors to obtain regulatory clearances or approvals of our products outside of the United States. If we are unable to obtain additional clearances or approvals needed to market existing or new products in the United States or elsewhere or obtain these clearances or approvals in a timely fashion or at all, or if our existing clearances are revoked, our revenues and profitability may decline. Modifications to our current products may require new marketing clearances or approvals or require us to cease marketing or recall the modified products until such clearances or approvals are obtained. Any modification to an FDA cleared medical device that could significantly affect its safety or effectiveness, or that would constitute a major change or modification in its intended use, requires a new FDA 510(k) clearance or, possibly, a premarket approval. The FDA requires every manufacturer to make its own determination as to whether a modification requires a new 510(k) clearance or premarket approval, but the FDA may review and disagree with any decision reached by the manufacturer. We have modified aspects of some of our devices since receiving regulatory clearance. We believed that some of these modifications did not require new 510(k) clearance or premarket approval and, therefore, we did not seek new 510(k) clearances or premarket approvals. In the future, we may make additional modifications to our products after they have received FDA clearance or approval and, in appropriate circumstances, determine that new clearance or approval is unnecessary. Regulations in other countries in which we market or sell, or propose to market or sell, our products may also require that we make judgments about changes to our products and whether or not those changes are such that regulatory approval or clearance should be obtained. In the United States and elsewhere, regulatory authorities may disagree with our past or future decisions not to seek new clearance or approval and may require us to obtain clearance or approval for modifications to our products. If that were to occur for a previously cleared or approved product, we may be required to cease marketing or recall the modified device until we obtain the necessary clearance or approval. Under these circumstances, we may also be subject to significant regulatory fines or other penalties. If any of the foregoing were to occur, our financial condition and results of operations could be negatively impacted. Even after receiving regulatory clearance or approval, our products may be subject to product recalls, which may harm our reputation and divert managerial and financial resources. The FDA and similar governmental authorities in other countries have the authority to order mandatory recall of our products or order their removal from the market if there are material deficiencies or defects in design, manufacture, installation, servicing or labeling of the device, or if the governmental entity finds that our products would cause serious adverse health consequences. A government mandated voluntary recall or field action by us could occur as a result of comp1nt failures, manufacturing errors or design defects, including labeling defects. Any recall of our products may harm our reputation with customers and divert managerial and financial resources. We may be subject to fines, penalties, injunctions or costly investigations if we are determined to be promoting the use of our products for unapproved or off label uses. If we are incorrect in our belief that our promotional materials and training methods regarding physicians are conducted in compliance with regulations of the FDA and other applicable regulations, and the FDA determines that our promotional materials or training constitutes promotion of an unapproved use, the FDA could request that we modify our training or promotional materials or subject us to regulatory enforcement actions, including the issuance of a warning letter, injunction, 28 seizure, civil fine and criminal penalties. It is also possible that other federal, state or foreign enforcement authorities might take action if they consider promotional or training materials to constitute promotion of an unapproved use, which could result in significant fines or penalties under other statutory authorities, such as laws prohibiting false claims for reimbursement. Any of these results could have a material adverse effect on our financial position or results of operations. In June 2014 we received a subpoena from the U.S. Department of Justice (the DOJ ) requesting documents in relation to a criminal and civil investigation the DOJ is conducting regarding BTG International, Inc. LC Bead product beginning in 2003 RITA Medical Systems and AngioDynamics, Inc., after our acquisition of RITA, was the exclusive distributor of LC Beads in the United States from 2006 through December 31, 2011 We are cooperating fully with this investigation and at this time are unable to predict its scope, duration or outcome. In April 2015 we received a subpoena from the DOJ requesting documents in relation to a criminal and civil investigation the DOJ is conducting regarding purported promotion of certain of our VenaCure EVLT products for un cleared indications. As of May 31, 2017 the Company accrued $125 million for these matters and in August 2017, the Company agreed in principle with the government to resolve these matters for approximately $125 million. This balance was still accrued as of May 31, 2018 and was paid in the first quarter of fiscal year 2019. If our employees or agents violate the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act or anti bribery laws in other jurisdictions, we may incur fines or penalties, or experience other adverse consequences. We are subject to the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, or FCPA, and similar anti bribery laws in international jurisdictions, including the UK Anti Bribery Act, which generally prohibit companies and their intermediaries from making improper payments to non U.S. officials for the purpose of obtaining or retaining business. Because of the predominance of government sponsored healthcare systems around the world, many of our customer relationships outside of the United States are with governmental entities and are therefore subject to such anti bribery laws. Our sales to customers and distributors outside of the United States have been increasing and we expect them to continue to increase in the future. If our employees or agents violate the provisions of the FCPA or other anti bribery laws, we may incur fines or penalties, we may be unable to market our products in other countries or we may experience other adverse consequences which could have a material adverse effect on our operating results or financial condition. Laws and regulations governing the export of our products could adversely impact our business. The U.S. Department of the Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control (OFAC), and the Bureau of Industry and Security at the U.S. Department of Commerce (BIS), administer certain laws and regulations that restrict U.S. persons and, in some instances, non U.S. persons, in conducting activities, transacting business with or making investments in certain countries, governments, entities and individuals subject to U.S. economic sanctions. Due to our international operations, we are subject to such laws and regulations, which are complex, restrict our business dealings with certain countries and individuals, and are constantly changing. Further restrictions may be enacted, amended, enforced or interpreted in a manner that materially impacts our operations. From time to time, certain of our subsidiaries have limited business dealings in countries subject to comprehensive sanctions, including Iran. Certain of our subsidiaries sell medical devices and surgical tools, and may provide related services, to distributors and other purchasing bodies in such countries. These business dealings represent an insignificant amount of our consolidated revenues and income, but expose us to a heightened risk of violating applicable sanctions regulations. Violations of these regulations are punishable by civil penalties, including fines, denial of export privileges, injunctions, asset seizures, debarment from government contracts and revocations or restrictions of licenses, as well as criminal fines and imprisonment. We have established policies and procedures designed to assist with our compliance with such laws and regulations. However, there can be no assurance that our policies and procedures will effectively prevent us from violating these regulations in every transaction in which we may engage, and such a violation could adversely affect our reputation, business, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows. Changes in reimbursement levels by governmental or other third party payors for procedures using our products may cause our revenues to decline. Our products are purchased principally by hospitals or physicians which typically bill various third party payors, such as governmental programs (e.g. Medicare, Medicaid and comparable foreign programs), private insurance plans and managed care plans, for the healthcare services provided to their patients. The ability of our customers to obtain appropriate reimbursement for products and services from third party payors is critical to the success of medical device companies because it affects which products customers purchase and the prices they are willing to pay. Reimbursement varies by country and can significantly impact the acceptance of new technology. Implementation of healthcare reforms in the United States and in other countries may limit, reduce or eliminate reimbursement for our products and adversely affect both our pricing flexibility and the demand for 29 our products. Even when we develop a promising new product, we may find limited demand for the product unless reimbursement approval is obtained from private and governmental third party payors. Third party payors have adopted, and are continuing to adopt, a number of healthcare policies intended to curb rising healthcare costs. These policies include controls on government funded reimbursement for healthcare services and price controls on medical products and services providers; challenges to the pricing of medical procedures or limits or prohibitions on reimbursement for specific devices and therapies through other means; and the introduction of managed care systems in which healthcare providers contract to provide comprehensive healthcare for a fixed cost per person. We are unable to predict whether federal, state or local healthcare reform legislation or regulation affecting our business may be proposed or enacted in the future, or what effect any such legislation or regulation would have on our business. Changes in healthcare systems in the United States or elsewhere in a manner that significantly reduces reimbursement for procedures using our medical devices or denies coverage for these procedures, or adverse decisions relating to our products by administrators of these systems in coverage or reimbursement issues, would have an adverse impact on the acceptance of our products and the prices which our customers are willing to pay for them. RISKS RELATED TO INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY If we fail to adequately protect our intellectual property rights, we may not be able to generate revenues from new or existing products and our business may suffer. Our success depends in part on obtaining, maintaining and enforcing our patents, trademarks and other proprietary rights, and our ability to avoid infringing the proprietary rights of others. We take precautionary steps to protect our technological advantages and intellectual property. We rely upon patent, trade secret, copyright, know how and trademark laws, as well as license agreements and contractual provisions, to establish our intellectual property rights and protect our products. However, no assurances can be made that any pending or future patent applications will result in the issuance of patents, that any current or future patents issued to, or licensed by, us will not be challenged or circumvented by our competitors, or that our patents will not be found invalid. Patent positions of medical device companies, including our Company, are uncertain and involve complex and evolving legal and factual questions. The coverage sought in a patent application can be denied or significantly reduced either before or after the patent is issued. Consequently, there can be no assurance that any of our pending patent applications will result in an issued patent. There is also no assurance that any existing or future patent will provide significant protection or commercial advantage, or whether any existing or future patent will be circumvented by a more basic patent, thus requiring us to obtain a license to produce and sell the product. Generally, patent applications can be maintained in secrecy for at least 18 months after their earliest priority date. In addition, publication of discoveries in the scientific or patent literature often lags behind actual discoveries. Therefore, we cannot be certain that we were the first to invent the subject matter covered by each of our pending U.S. patent applications or that we were the first to file non U.S. patent applications for such subject matter. Additionally, we rely on trade secret protection for certain unpatented aspects of our proprietary technology. There can be no assurance that others will not independently develop or otherwise acquire substantially equivalent proprietary information or techniques, that others will not gain access to our proprietary technology or disclose such technology, or that we can meaningfully protect our trade secrets. We have a policy of requiring key employees and consultants to execute confidentiality agreements upon the commencement of an employment or consulting relationship with us. Our confidentiality agreements also require our employees to assign to us all rights to any inventions made or conceived during their employment with us. We also generally require our consultants to assign to us any inventions made during the course of their engagement by us. There can be no assurance, however, that these agreements will provide meaningful protection or adequate remedies for us in the event of unauthorized use, transfer or disclosure of confidential information or inventions. If we are not able to adequately protect our intellectual property, our market share, financial condition and results of operations may suffer. 30 If third parties claim that our products infringe their intellectual property rights, we may be forced to expend significant financial resources and management time defending against such actions and our financial condition and our results of operations could suffer. Third parties may claim that our products infringe their patents and other intellectual property rights. Identifying third party patent rights can be particularly difficult because, in general, patent applications can be maintained in secrecy for at least 18 months after their earliest priority date. Some companies in the medical device industry have used intellectual property infringement litigation to gain a competitive advantage. If a competitor were to challenge our patents, licenses or other intellectual property rights, or assert that our products infringe its patent or other intellectual property rights, we could incur substantial litigation costs, be forced to make expensive changes to our product design, pay royalties or other fees to license rights in order to continue manufacturing and selling our products, or pay substantial damages. Third party infringement claims, regardless of their outcome, would not only consume our financial resources but also divert our management time and effort. Such claims could also cause our customers or potential customers to purchase competitors products or defer or limit their purchase or use of our affected products until resolution of the claim. See Note 15 in the consolidated financial statements. RISKS RELATED TO OUR STOCK PRICE Our future operating results are difficult to predict and may vary significantly from quarter to quarter, which may adversely affect the price of our common stock. The ongoing introduction of new products and services that affect our overall product mix make the prediction of future operating results difficult. You should not rely on our past results as any indication of future operating results. The price of our common stock will likely fall in the event that our operating results do not meet the expectations of analysts and investors. Comparisons of our quarterly operating results are an unreliable indication of our future performance because they are likely to vary significantly based on many factors, including the level of sales of our products and services in our markets; our ability to introduce new products or services and enhancements in a timely manner; the demand for and acceptance of our products and services; the success of our competition and the introduction of alternative products or services; our ability to command favorable pricing for our products and services; the growth of the market for our devices and services; the expansion and rate of success of our direct sales force in the United States and internationally and our independent distributors internationally; actions relating to ongoing FDA compliance; the effect of intellectual property disputes; the size and timing of orders from independent distributors or customers; the attraction and retention of key personnel, particularly in sales and marketing, regulatory, manufacturing and research and development; unanticipated delays or an inability to control costs; general economic conditions as well as those specific to our customers and markets; and seasonal fluctuations in revenue due to the elective nature of some procedures. Our stock price may be volatile, which may cause the value of our stock to decline or subject us to a securities class action litigation. The trading price of our common stock price may be volatile and could be subject to wide fluctuations in price in response to various factors, many of which are beyond our control, including general economic, industry and market conditions; actions by institutional or other large stockholders; the depth and liquidity of the market for our common stock; volume and timing of orders for our products; developments generally affecting medical device companies; the announcement of new products or product enhancements by us or our competitors; changes in earnings estimates or recommendations by securities analysts; investor perceptions of us and our business, including changes in market valuations of medical device companies; and our results of operations and financial performance. 31 In addition, the stock market in general, and the NASDAQ Stock Market and the market for medical devices in particular, have experienced substantial price and volume volatility that is often seemingly unrelated to the operating performance of particular companies. These broad market fluctuations may cause the trading price of our common stock to decline. In the past, securities class action litigation has often been brought against a company after a period of volatility in the market price of its common stock. We may become involved in this type of litigation in the future. Any securities litigation claims brought against us could result in substantial expense and the diversion of management attention from our business. Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments. N1 32 Item 2 Item 2 Properties.
